Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5543.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) A fund to be known as the Michigan transportation fund is established in the state treasury as a separate fund. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the legislature shall appropriate money for the necessary expenses incurred in the administration and enforcement of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1001 to 207.1170, the motor carrier act, 1933 PA 254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, and sections 801 to 810 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.801 to 257.810. Money appropriated for necessary expenses must be based upon established cost allocation methodology that reflects actual costs. Appropriations for the necessary expenses incurred by the department of state in administration and enforcement of sections 801 to 810 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.801 to 257.810, must be made from the Michigan transportation fund and from money in the transportation administration collection fund created in section 810b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.810b. Appropriations from the Michigan transportation fund for the necessary expenses incurred by the department of state in administration and enforcement of sections 801 to 810 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.801 to 257.810, must not exceed $20,000,000.00 per state fiscal year. Except as provided in section 51d of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.51d, all All money in the Michigan transportation fund is apportioned and appropriated in the following manner: (a) Not more than $3,000,000.00 as may be annually appropriated each fiscal year to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the rail grade crossing account. (b) Not more than $3,000,000.00 $6,000,000.00 as may be annually appropriated each fiscal year to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the grade crossing surface account. (c) Not more than $3,000,000.00 each year to the local bridge fund established in subsection (4) for the purpose of payment of the principal, interest, and redemption premium on any notes or bonds issued by the state transportation commission under former section 11b or subsection (9). (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision and subject to section 11h, $2,000,000.00 each year of the revenue from 3 cents of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the local agency wetland mitigation board fund created in section 11h. (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, $5,000,000.00 each year of the revenue from 3 cents of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the movable bridge fund created in section 11g, with the remainder to the state trunk line fund, county road commissions, and cities and villages in the percentages provided in subdivision (l). The department shall annually adjust the amount allocated under this subdivision by an amount equal to the annual increase in the Detroit Consumer Price Index for the preceding year. (f) One-half of the revenue from 1 cent of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the state trunk line fund for the repair of state bridges under section 11, and 1/2 of the revenue from 1 cent of the tax levied under section 8(1)(a) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, to the local bridge fund created in subsection (4) for distribution only to cities, villages, and county road commissions. (g) $50,000,000.00 to the state trunk line fund for debt service costs on state of Michigan projects. (h) Ten percent to the comprehensive transportation fund for the purposes described in section 10e. (i) $5,000,000.00 to the local bridge fund established in subsection (4) for distribution only to the local bridge advisory board, the regional bridge councils, cities, villages, and county road commissions. (j) $36,775,000.00 to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the transportation economic development fund created in section 2 of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.902, with first priority for allocation to debt service on bonds issued to fund transportation economic development fund projects. In addition, $3,500,000.00 is appropriated from the Michigan transportation fund to the state trunk line fund for subsequent deposit in the transportation economic development fund created in section 2 of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.902, to be used for economic development road projects in any of the targeted industries described in section 9(1)(a) of 1987 PA 231, MCL 247.909. (k) Not less than $33,000,000.00 as may be annually appropriated each fiscal year to the local program fund created in section 11e. (l) The balance of the Michigan transportation fund, as well as funds allocated to the Michigan transportation fund and collected under the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, as follows, after deduction of the amounts appropriated in subdivisions (a) to (k): (i) 39.1% to the state trunk line fund for the purposes described in section 11 and section 10o(5). (ii) 39.1% to the county road commissions of this state. (iii) 21.8% to the cities and villages of this state. (2) The money appropriated under this section must be used for the purposes as provided in this act and any other applicable act. Subject to section 9b, the department shall develop programs in conjunction with the Michigan Chamber of Commerce and the Michigan Minority Supplier Development Council to assist small businesses, including those located in enterprise zones and those located in empowerment zones as determined under federal law, as defined by law in becoming qualified to bid. (3) From federal funds, an amount equal to 31-1/2% of the money formerly appropriated to this state from the federal government under former 23 USC 157, commonly known as minimum guarantee funds, must be allocated to the transportation economic development fund, if the allocation is consistent with federal law. This money must be distributed 16-1/2% for development projects for rural counties as defined by law and 15% for capacity improvement or advanced traffic management systems in urban counties as defined by law. Federal money allocated for distribution under this section is eligible for obligation and use by all recipients as provided in the moving ahead for progress in the 21st century act, Public Law 112-141. (4) A fund to be known as the local bridge fund is established in the state treasury as a separate fund. The money appropriated to the local bridge fund and the interest accruing to that fund must be expended for the local bridge program. The purpose of the fund is to provide financial assistance to highway authorities for the preservation, improvement, or reconstruction of existing bridges or for the construction of bridges to replace existing bridges in whole or part. The money in the local bridge fund is not subject to section 12(15) or 13(5). The local bridge advisory board is created and must consist of 6 voting members appointed by the state transportation commission and 2 nonvoting members appointed by the department. The board must include 3 members from the County Road Association of Michigan: , 1 member who represents counties with populations 65,000 or greater, 1 member who represents counties with populations greater than 30,000 and less than 65,000, and 1 member who represents counties with populations of 30,000 or less. Three members must be appointed from the Michigan Municipal League: , 1 member who represents cities with a population 75,000 or greater, 1 member who represents cities with a population less than 75,000, and 1 member who represents villages. Each organization with voting rights shall submit a list of nominees in each population category to the state transportation commission. The state transportation commission shall make the appointments from the lists submitted under this subsection. Voting members must be appointed for 2 years. The chairperson of the board must be selected from among the voting members of the board. In addition to the 2 nonvoting members, the department shall provide qualified administrative staff and qualified technical assistance to the board. (5) No less than 5% and no more than 15% of the money received in the local bridge fund may be used for critical repair of large bridges and emergencies as determined by the local bridge advisory board. Money remaining after the money allocated for critical large bridge repair and emergencies is deducted must be distributed by the board to the regional bridge councils created under this section. One regional council must be formed for each department of transportation region as those regions exist on October 1, 2004. The regional councils must consist of 2 members of the County Road Association of Michigan from counties in the region, 2 members of the Michigan Municipal League from cities and villages in the region, and 1 member of the department in each region. The members of the department are nonvoting members and shall provide qualified administrative staff and qualified technical assistance to the regional councils. (6) Money in the local bridge fund after deduction of the amounts set aside for critical repair of large bridges and emergency repairs must be distributed among the regional bridge councils according to all of the following ratios, which must be assigned a weight expressed as a percentage as determined by the board, with each ratio receiving no greater than a 50% weight and no less than a 25% weight: (a) A ratio with a numerator that is the total number of local bridges in the region and a denominator that is the total number of local bridges in this state. (b) A ratio with a numerator that is the total local bridge deck area in the region and a denominator that is the total local bridge deck area in this state. (c) A ratio with a numerator that is the total amount of structurally deficient local bridge deck area in the region and a denominator that is the total amount of structurally deficient local bridge deck area in this state. (7) The regional bridge councils shall allocate the money received from the board for the preservation, improvement, and reconstruction of existing bridges or for the construction of bridges to replace existing bridges in whole or in part in each region. (8) Each January, the department shall submit a report to the chair and the minority vice-chair of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and to the standing committees on transportation of the senate and the house of representatives, on all of the following activities for the previous state fiscal year: (a) A listing of how much money was dedicated for emergency and large bridge repair. (b) A listing of what emergency and large bridge repair projects were funded. (c) The actual weights used in the calculation required under subsection (6). (d) A listing of the total money distributed to each region. (e) A listing of the specific projects that were funded under subsection (7). (9) The state transportation commission shall borrow money and issue notes or bonds in an amount of not less than $30,000,000.00 to supplement the funding provided for the local bridge program under subsection (5). The bonds or notes issued under this subsection may be issued by the commission for any purpose for which other local bridge money may be used under this section. The bonds or notes authorized by this subsection must be issued by resolution of the state transportation commission consistent with the requirements of section 18b. (10) The department shall promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, governing the administration of the local bridge program. The rules must set forth the eligibility criteria for financial assistance under the program and other matters related to the program that the department considers necessary and desirable. The department shall take into consideration the availability of federal aid and other financial resources of the highway authority responsible for the bridge, the importance of the bridge to the highway, road, or street network, and the condition of the existing bridge. (11) The revenue appropriated to the local bridge fund under subsection (1)(i) must be distributed only to the local bridge advisory board, the regional bridge councils, cities, villages, and county road commissions. (12) The regional bridge councils shall determine what bridge projects are selected for funding from the local bridge fund created in subsection (4) and shall make a list of selected projects available to interested parties in the region. A determination that a bridge project is selected for funding in a given fiscal year is not approval to disburse the money. (13) A county road commission, city, or village may implement a bridge project if the bridge project has been selected for funding and is included in the appropriate regional bridge council's current multiyear bridge plan for the local bridge program but the regional bridge council has not allocated money to the bridge project for the fiscal year that the bridge project is on the current multiyear bridge plan. A county road commission, city, or village may borrow money to implement a project that has been selected for funding and is included in the appropriate regional bridge council's current multiyear bridge plan but has not been allocated money by the regional bridge council. Based on available local bridge money, when a bridge project that was implemented with borrowed money is allocated funding in a subsequent fiscal year, the funding must only be used to repay the amount approved by the multiyear bridge plan when the money was borrowed. To be eligible for repayment of the amount borrowed, a bridge project that has been implemented with borrowed money must be administered through the department's local bridge program.